Ohio, session 136, HB1000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3517.15, 3517.16, 3517.23, and 3517.99 be amended and section 3517.24 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3517.15. (A)(1) No prosecution shall commence for a violation of a provision in sections 145.054, 742.043, 3307.073, 3309.073, 3517.08 to 3517.12, 3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3517.24, 3599.03, 3599.031, or 5505.045 of the Revised Code unless a complaint has been filed with the secretary of state under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code and all proceedings under sections 3517.16 to 3517.18 of the Revised Code are completed. (2) A complaint may be filed with the secretary of state under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code for a violation of a provision in sections 3501.35, 3599.13, 3599.14, or 3599.21, division (A) of section 3599.11, or division (A)(1) or (2) of section 3599.12 of the Revised Code that occurs on or after the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025. A prosecution may commence for a violation of such a provision at any time before or after a complaint has been filed with the secretary of state under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The Ohio election integrity commission shall hear all matters referred to the commission by the secretary of state under division (E)(3) of section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. (2) The commission may recommend legislation and render advisory opinions concerning the provisions of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of this section for persons over whose acts the commission has or may have jurisdiction. When the commission renders an advisory opinion relating to a specific set of circumstances involving any of those sections stating that there is no violation of a provision in those sections, the person to whom the opinion is directed or a person who is similarly situated may reasonably rely on the opinion and is immune from criminal prosecution and a civil action, including, without limitation, a civil action for removal from public office or employment, based on facts and circumstances covered by the opinion. An advisory opinion issued by the Ohio elections commission that is in effect as of the effective date of this amendment September 30, 2025, is considered an advisory opinion of the Ohio election integrity commission, unless and until the Ohio election integrity commission amends or rescinds the advisory opinion. (C) The secretary of state and the boards of elections shall furnish the information that the commission requests. The commission or a member of the commission may administer oaths, and the commission may issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. Section 101.42 of the Revised Code governs the issuance of subpoenas insofar as applicable. Upon the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. (D) The Ohio election integrity commission shall establish a web site on which it shall post, at a minimum, all decisions and advisory opinions issued by the commission, all decisions and advisory opinions issued by the Ohio elections commission before the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025, and copies of each election law as it is amended by the general assembly. The Ohio election integrity commission shall update the web site regularly to reflect any changes to those decisions and advisory opinions and any new decisions and advisory opinions. Sec. 3517.16. (A)(1) Any Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(4) of this section, any person who has personal knowledge of a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.15 of the Revised Code may file a complaint with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed under penalty of perjury. (2) An Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(4) of this section, an official at a board of elections may file a complaint with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed under penalty of perjury, alleging a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.15 of the Revised Code. (3) The Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(4) of this section, the election integrity unit of the office of the secretary of state may initiate a complaint alleging a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. (4) Only a candidate who has personal knowledge of a violation of section 3517.24 of the Revised Code and who is materially harmed by the violation may file a complaint alleging a violation of that section. The candidate shall file the complaint with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed under penalty of perjury, and shall describe with particularity the material harm to the candidate caused by the violation. (B)(1) Subject to division (F) of this section, the election integrity unit shall review each complaint filed with the secretary of state under division (A)(1) or , (2), or (4) of this section. If the complaint does not allege a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.15 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a complaint filed under division (A)(1) or (4) of this section, is does not based on personal knowledge meet all applicable requirements of that division, the secretary of state shall dismiss the complaint. Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, a dismissal under this division is without prejudice. (2) After a complaint is dismissed under division (B)(1) of this section on the ground that the complaint is not based on personal knowledge, if the same person files another complaint alleging the same or a substantially similar violation and the complaint is not based on personal knowledge, the secretary of state shall dismiss the complaint with prejudice. (3) If the complaint is not dismissed under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, the election integrity unit shall investigate the complaint. (C) Subject to division (F) of this section, the election integrity unit shall draft a report to the secretary of state concerning each complaint filed under division (A) of this section that is not dismissed under division (B) of this section. The report shall recommend that the secretary of state make a particular finding and, if applicable, impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution, in accordance with section 3517.17 of the Revised Code. (D) The election integrity unit may join two or more complaints if the unit determines that the allegations in each complaint are of the same or similar character, are based on the same act or failure to act, or are based on two or more acts or failures to act constituting parts of a common scheme or plan. If one complaint contains two or more allegations, the unit may separate the allegations if they are not of the same or similar character, if they are not based on the same act or failure to act, or if they are not based on two or more acts or failures to act constituting parts of a common scheme or plan. If the unit separates the allegations in a complaint, the unit may make separate recommendations under division (C) of this section for each allegation. (E)(1) Upon receiving the recommendation of the election integrity unit under division (C) of this section, the secretary of state shall review the report and recommendation and shall do one of the following: (a) Refer the matter back to the unit for further investigation and a revised recommendation under division (C) of this section; (b) Make a finding in accordance with section 3517.17 of the Revised Code, and, if applicable, impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution. (2) The secretary of state shall serve notice of the secretary of state's decision under division (E)(1)(b) of this section on the person who is alleged to have committed the violation in accordance with section 119.05 of the Revised Code. (3) If, within fourteen days after service of the notice is complete under section 119.05 of the Revised Code, the person objects to the secretary of state's decision, the secretary of state shall not impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution, and immediately shall refer the matter to the Ohio election integrity commission for its determination under section 3517.17 of the Revised Code. (4) If the person does not object to the secretary of state's decision within fourteen days after receiving the notice, the secretary of state's decision is final and, if applicable, the secretary of state shall impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution as determined under division (E)(1)(b) of this section. (F)(1) If any of the following apply to a complaint, the secretary of state shall proceed under division (F)(2) of this section: (a) The secretary of state is a party to the complaint. (b) A candidate for an office for which the secretary of state is also a candidate is a party to the complaint or is otherwise involved in the complaint. (c) The complaint involves a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure made to advocate the election or defeat of the secretary of state or a candidate for an office for which the secretary of state is also a candidate. (d) The secretary of state determines that the secretary of state otherwise has a conflict of interest with respect to the complaint or that the secretary of state should proceed under division (F)(2) of this section to avoid any appearance of impropriety. (2) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of divisions (B) to (E) of this section, when division (F)(1) of this section applies to a complaint, the secretary of state shall request the attorney general to designate one or more persons to fulfill the duties of the election integrity unit described in divisions (B) to (D) of this section. The attorney general shall designate those persons and shall fulfill the duties of the secretary of state under divisions (B) to (D) of this section. Sec. 3517.23. The secretary of state shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are necessary for the administration and enforcement of sections 3517.08 to 3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3517.24, 3599.03, and 3599.031 of the Revised Code and shall provide each candidate, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, political party, and person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications with written instructions and explanations in order to ensure compliance with sections 3517.08 to 3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3517.24, 3599.03, and 3599.031 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.24. (A) As used in this section, "deceptive synthetic media" means an image or an audio or video recording of a real individual's appearance, speech, or conduct that is realistic but false, that is created or intentionally manipulated using generative adversarial network techniques or other digital technology, and to which either of the following apply: (1) It appears to a reasonable person to depict the individual making a statement the individual did not make or taking an action the individual did not take. (2) It gives a reasonable person a fundamentally different understanding or impression of the individual's appearance, speech, or conduct than an unaltered, original version of the image or audio or video recording would give the reasonable person. (B) During the period beginning ninety days before the day of an election at which a candidate seeks nomination or election to office and ending on the day of the election, no person shall knowingly create and disseminate, or knowingly cause to be created and disseminated, deceptive synthetic media with the intent to affect the results of the election with respect to that candidate without disclosing that fact as follows: (1) In the case of an image, the image shall be accompanied by the following written statement: "This image has been manipulated or generated by artificial intelligence." The statement shall be in a font size that is easily readable by the average viewer and that is not smaller than the largest font size of any other text appearing in the image. (2) In the case of an audio recording, the audio recording shall include the following statement, spoken in a clear manner at a pitch that is easily heard by the average listener: "This audio recording has been manipulated or generated by artificial intelligence." The statement shall be made at the beginning and end of the audio recording and, in the case of an audio recording that is more than two minutes long, at least every two minutes during the audio recording. (3) In the case of a video recording, the video recording shall include, for the entire duration of the video recording, the following written statement: "This video recording has been manipulated or generated by artificial intelligence." The statement shall be in a font size that is easily readable by the average viewer and that is not smaller than the largest font size of any other text appearing in the video recording. Sec. 3517.99. Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.991 of the Revised Code: (A)(1) A candidate whose campaign committee violates division (A), (B), (C), (D), or (V) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code, or a treasurer of a campaign committee who violates any of those divisions, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of violation. (2) Whoever violates division (E) or (X)(5) of section 3517.13 or division (E)(1) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of violation. (B) An entity that violates division (G)(1) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of violation. (C) Whoever violates division (G)(2) of section 3517.101, division (G) of section 3517.13, or division (E)(2) or (3) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars or, if the offender is a person who was nominated or elected to public office, shall forfeit the nomination or the office to which the offender was elected, or both. (D) Whoever violates division (F) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than three times the amount contributed. (E) Whoever violates division (H) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars. (F) Whoever violates division (O), (P), or (Q) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (G) A state or county committee of a political party that violates division (B)(1) of section 3517.18 of the Revised Code as that section existed before its repeal by H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly shall be fined not more than twice the amount of the improper expenditure. (H) An entity that violates division (H) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than twice the amount of the improper expenditure or use. (I)(1) Any individual who violates division (B)(1) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code and knows that the contribution the individual makes violates that division shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2) Any political action committee that violates division (B)(2) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (3) Any campaign committee that violates division (B)(3) or (5) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (4)(a) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (B)(6) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division, as applicable. (b) Any state political party, county political party, or state candidate fund of a state political party or county political party that violates division (B)(6) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division, as applicable. (c) Any political contributing entity that violates division (B)(7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (5) Any political party that violates division (B)(4) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (6) Notwithstanding divisions (I)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section, no violation of division (B) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code occurs, and the secretary of state shall not file a complaint under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code, if the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division meets either of the following conditions: (a) It is completely refunded within five business days after it is accepted. (b) It is completely refunded on or before the tenth business day after notification to the recipient of the excess transfer or contribution by the board of elections or the secretary of state that a transfer or contribution in excess of the permitted amount has been received. (J)(1) Any campaign committee that violates division (C)(1), (2), (3), or (6) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2)(a) Any county political party that violates division (C)(4)(a)(ii) or (iii) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted. (b) Any county political party that violates division (C)(4)(a)(i) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount from its state candidate fund equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (c) Any state political party that violates division (C)(4)(b) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount from its state candidate fund equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (3) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (C)(5) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (4) Any political action committee or political contributing entity that violates division (C)(7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (5) Notwithstanding divisions (J)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, no violation of division (C) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code occurs, and the secretary of state shall not file a complaint under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code, if the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted to be accepted by that division meets either of the following conditions: (a) It is completely refunded within five business days after its acceptance. (b) It is completely refunded on or before the tenth business day after notification to the recipient of the excess transfer or contribution by the board of elections or the secretary of state that a transfer or contribution in excess of the permitted amount has been received. (K)(1) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (F)(1) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined twenty-five dollars for each day of violation. (2) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (F)(2) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall give to the treasurer of state for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio election integrity commission fund all excess contributions not disposed of as required by division (E) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code. (L) Whoever violates section 3517.105 of the Revised Code shall be fined one thousand dollars. (M)(1) Whoever solicits a contribution in violation of section 3517.092 or violates division (B) of section 3517.09 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) Whoever knowingly accepts a contribution in violation of division (B) or (C) of section 3517.092 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in violation of either of those divisions and shall return to the contributor any amount so accepted. Whoever unknowingly accepts a contribution in violation of division (B) or (C) of section 3517.092 of the Revised Code shall return to the contributor any amount so accepted. (N) Whoever violates division (S) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount of funds transferred or three times the value of the assets transferred in violation of that division. (O) Any campaign committee that accepts a contribution or contributions in violation of section 3517.108 of the Revised Code, uses a contribution in violation of that section, or fails to dispose of excess contributions in violation of that section shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted, used, or kept in violation of that section. (P) Any political party, state candidate fund, legislative candidate fund, or campaign committee that violates division (T) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed or accepted in violation of that section. (Q) A treasurer of a committee or another person who violates division (U) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars. (R) Whoever violates division (I) or (J) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars. Whenever a person is found guilty of violating division (I) or (J) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code, the contract awarded in violation of either of those divisions shall be rescinded if its terms have not yet been performed. (S) A candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a campaign committee who violates section 3517.081 of the Revised Code, and a candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a campaign committee or another person who violates division (C) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars. (T) A candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a committee who violates division (B) of section 3517.09 of the Revised Code, or a candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a campaign committee or another person who violates division (C) of section 3517.09 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars. (U) Whoever violates section 3517.20 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars. (V) Whoever violates section 3517.21 or 3517.22 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for not more than six months or fined not more than five thousand dollars, or both. (W) Any campaign committee that fails to file the declaration of filing-day finances required by division (F) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code shall be fined twenty-five dollars for each day of violation. (X)(1) Any campaign committee that fails to dispose of excess funds or excess aggregate contributions under division (B) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code in the manner required by division (C) of that section shall give to the treasurer of state for deposit into the Ohio election integrity commission fund created under section 111.29 of the Revised Code all funds not disposed of pursuant to that division. (2) Any treasurer of a transition fund that fails to dispose of assets remaining in the transition fund as required under division (H)(1) or (2) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall give to the treasurer of state for deposit into the Ohio election integrity commission fund all assets not disposed of pursuant to that division. (Y) Any individual, campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, political party, treasurer of a transition fund, or other entity that violates any provision of sections 3517.09 to 3517.12 of the Revised Code for which no penalty is provided for under any other division of this section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars. (Z)(1) Whoever knowingly violates division (W)(1) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed, expended, or promised in violation of that division or ten thousand dollars, whichever amount is greater. (2) Whoever knowingly violates division (W)(2) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount solicited or accepted in violation of that division or ten thousand dollars, whichever amount is greater. (AA) Whoever knowingly violates division (C) or (D) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars plus not more than one thousand dollars for each day of violation. (BB)(1) Subject to division (BB)(2) of this section, whoever violates division (H) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount up to three times the amount disbursed for the direct costs of airing the communication made in violation of that division. (2) Whoever has been ordered by the Ohio election integrity commission or by a court of competent jurisdiction to cease making communications in violation of division (H) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code who again violates that division shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount disbursed for the direct costs of airing the communication made in violation of that division. (CC)(1) Any corporation or labor organization that violates division (X)(3)(a) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount given in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2) Any state or county political party that violates division (X)(3)(b) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (DD)(1) Any campaign committee or person who violates division (C)(1)(b) or (c) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount donated in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2) Any officeholder or treasurer of a transition fund who violates division (C)(3)(a) or (b) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (EE)(1) Whoever violates section 3517.24 of the Revised Code in a manner that causes material harm to a candidate is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree on a second or subsequent offense, except that the person shall be fined not more than three thousand dollars on a second or subsequent offense. (2) A person who violates section 3517.24 of the Revised Code in manner that does not cause material harm to a candidate is not subject to any penalty for that violation. Section 2. That existing sections 3517.15, 3517.16, 3517.23, and 3517.99 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.